Washington statutes.
RCW 35.100.030

Local retail sales and use tax increment revenue—Applications.

Local retail sales and use tax increment revenue, or any portion thereof, may be applied as follows:

(1) To pay downtown or neighborhood commercial district community revitalization costs;

(2) To pay into bond redemption funds established to pay the principal and interest on general obligation or revenue bonds issued to finance a downtown or neighborhood commercial district community revitalization project;

(3) In combination with any other public or private funds available to the city or town for the purposes provided in this section; or

(4) To pay any combination of costs under subsection (1), (2), or (3) of this section.

[ 2002 c 79 s 3.]